Utah statutes.
78B-10-103.   Scope.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2) or (3), this chapter
applies to a mediation in which:
(a)  the mediation parties are required to mediate by statute, court, or
administrative agency rule or referred to mediation by a court, administrative
agency, or arbitrator;
(b)  the mediation parties and the mediator agree to mediate in a record that
demonstrates an expectation that mediation communications will be privileged
against disclosure; or
(c)  the mediation parties use as a mediator an individual who holds himself
or herself out as a mediator or the mediation is provided by an entity that
holds itself out as providing mediation.
(2)  The chapter does not apply to a mediation:
(a)  relating to the establishment, negotiation, administration, or
termination of a collective bargaining relationship;
(b)  relating to a dispute that is pending under or is part of the processes
established by a collective bargaining agreement, except that the chapter
applies to a mediation arising out of a dispute that has been filed with an
administrative agency or court;
(c)  conducted by a judge who might make a ruling on the case; or
(d)  conducted under the auspices of:
(i)  a primary or secondary school if all the parties are students; or
(ii)  a correctional institution for youths if all the parties are residents
of that institution.
(3)  If the parties agree in advance in a signed record, or a record of
proceeding reflects agreement by the parties, that all or part of a mediation
is not privileged, the privileges under Sections 78B-10-104 through 78B-10-106
do not apply to the mediation or part agreed upon.  However, Sections
78B-10-104 through 78B-10-106 apply to a mediation communication made by a
person that has not received actual notice of the agreement before the
communication is made.
